Utah statutes.
58-44a-502.   Unprofessional conduct.

"Unprofessional conduct" includes:

(1)  disregard for a patient's dignity or right to privacy as to his person, condition, possessions, or medical record;

(2)  engaging in an act, practice, or omission which when considered with the duties and responsibilities of a certified nurse midwife does or could jeopardize the health, safety, or welfare of a patient or the public;

(3)  failure to confine one's practice as a certified nurse midwife to those acts or practices permitted by law;

(4)  failure to file or record any medical report as required by law, impeding or obstructing the filing or recording of such a report, or inducing another to fail to file or record such a report;

(5)  breach of a statutory, common law, regulatory, or ethical requirement of confidentiality with respect to a person who is a patient, unless ordered by the court;

(6)  failure to pay a penalty imposed by the division; and

(7)  prescribing a schedule II-III controlled substance without a consulting physician.

